Utah statutes.
70A-9a-603.    Agreement on standards concerning rights and duties.

(1)  The parties may determine by agreement the standards measuring the fulfillment of the rights of a debtor or obligor and the duties of a secured party under a rule stated in Section 70A-9a-602 if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to the duty under Section 70A-9a-609 to refrain from breaching the peace.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

